Hawaii, session 2026, SB279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 712-1241, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows: "(1)  A person commits the offense of promoting a dangerous drug in the first degree if the person knowingly: (a)  Possesses one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of: (i)  One ounce or more, containing methamphetamine, heroin, morphine, fentanyl, or cocaine or any of their respective salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or (ii)  One and one-half ounce or more, containing one or more of any of the other dangerous drugs; (b)  Distributes: (i)  Twenty-five or more capsules, tablets, ampules, dosage units, or syrettes containing one or more dangerous drugs; or (ii)  One or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of: (A)  One-eighth ounce or more, containing methamphetamine, heroin, morphine, fentanyl, or cocaine or any of their respective salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or (B)  Three-eighths ounce or more, containing any other dangerous drug; (c)  Distributes any dangerous drug in any amount to a minor except for methamphetamine; or (d)  Manufactures a dangerous drug in any amount, except for methamphetamine; provided that this subsection shall not apply to any person registered under section 329-32." SECTION 2.  Section 712-1242, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows: "(1)  A person commits the offense of promoting a dangerous drug in the second degree if the person knowingly: (a)  Possesses twenty-five or more capsules, tablets, ampules, dosage units, or syrettes, containing one or more dangerous drugs; (b)  Possesses one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of: (i)  One-eighth ounce or more, containing methamphetamine, heroin, morphine, fentanyl, or cocaine or any of their respective salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or (ii)  One-fourth ounce or more, containing any dangerous drug; or (c)  Distributes any dangerous drug in any amount." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request